test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_mielgas_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 

  Noun - mielgâs+v2: 
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: mielgâs
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: mielgâsân
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: mielgâsist
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: mielgâsáin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: mielgâsttáá
    mielgâs+v2+N+Ess: mielgâsin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Par: mielgâsid
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: mielgâseh
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: mielgâsij
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: mielgâsijd
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: mielgâsáid
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: mielgâsijn
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: mielgâsijguin
    mielgâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: mielgâsijttáá


  Noun - ruonâs+v2: 
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: ruonâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: ruonnâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: ruonnâs
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: ruonâsân
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: ruonâsist
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: ruonâsáin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: ruonnâsttáá
    ruonâs+v2+N+Ess: ruonâsin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Par: ruonâsid
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: ruonâseh
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: ruonâsij
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: ruonâsijd
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: ruonâsáid
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: ruonâsijn
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: ruonâsijguin
    ruonâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: ruonâsijttáá

  Noun - kuálus: # ok, MLO 
    kuálus+N+Sg+Nom: kuálus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Gen: kuállus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Acc: kuállus
    kuálus+N+Sg+Ill: kuállusân
    kuálus+N+Sg+Loc: kuállusist
    kuálus+N+Sg+Com: kuállusáin
    kuálus+N+Sg+Abe: kuállusttáá
    kuálus+N+Ess:    kuálusin
    kuálus+N+Par:    kuálusid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Nom: kuálluseh
    kuálus+N+Pl+Gen: kuállusij
    kuálus+N+Pl+Acc: kuállusijd
    kuálus+N+Pl+Ill: kuállusáid
    kuálus+N+Pl+Loc: kuállusijn
    kuálus+N+Pl+Com: kuállusijguin
    kuálus+N+Pl+Abe: kuállusijttáá

  Noun - suormâs+v2: 
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Nom: suormâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Gen: suormâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Acc: suormâs
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Ill: suormâsân
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Loc: suormâsist
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Com: suormâsáin
    suormâs+v2+N+Sg+Abe: suormâsttáá
    suormâs+v2+N+Ess: suormâsin
    suormâs+v2+N+Par: suormâsid
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Nom: suormâseh
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Gen: suormâsij
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Acc: suormâsijd
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Ill: suormâsáid
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Loc: suormâsijn
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Com: suormâsijguin
    suormâs+v2+N+Pl+Abe: suormâsijttáá

  Noun - siärvus+v2: 
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Nom: siärvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Gen: siärvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Acc: siärvus
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Ill: siärvusân
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Loc: siärvusist
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Com: siärvusáin
    siärvus+v2+N+Sg+Abe: siärvusttáá
    siärvus+v2+N+Ess: siärvusin
    siärvus+v2+N+Par: siärvusid
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Nom: siärvuseh
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Gen: siärvusij
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Acc: siärvusijd
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Ill: siärvusáid
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Loc: siärvusijn
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Com: siärvusijguin
    siärvus+v2+N+Pl+Abe: siärvusijttáá
